Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1074.
do enact as follows:AB1074,11Section 1. 15.01 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1074,2,14215.01 (6) “Division,” “bureau,” “section,” and “unit” means the subunits of a 3department or an independent agency, whether specifically created by law or 4created by the head of the department or the independent agency for the more 5economic and efficient administration and operation of the programs assigned to 6the department or independent agency. The office of credit unions and the office of 7the student loan ombudsman in the department of financial institutions, the office 8of the inspector general in the department of children and families, the office of the 9inspector general in the department of health services, and the office of children’s 10mental health in the department of health services have the meaning of “division” 11under this subsection. The office of the long-term care ombudsman under the board 12on aging and long-term care and the office of educational accountability and the 13office of literacy in the department of public instruction have the meaning of 14“bureau” under this subsection.AB1074,215Section 2. 15.02 (3) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1074,3,51615.02 (3) (c) 1. The principal subunit of the department is the “division”. Each 17division shall be headed by an “administrator”. The office of credit unions and the 18office of the student loan ombudsman in the department of financial institutions 1and the office of children’s mental health in the department of health services have 2the meaning of “division” and the director of credit unions in the department of 3financial institutions and the director of the office of children’s mental health in the 4department of health services have the meaning of “administrator” under this 5subdivision.AB1074,36Section 3. 15.185 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB1074,3,8715.185 (6) Office of the student loan ombudsman. There is created in the 8department of financial institutions an office of the student loan ombudsman.AB1074,49Section 4. 220.02 (2) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1074,3,1110220.02 (2) (h) Nondepository small business lenders under subch. IV VI of ch. 11224.AB1074,512Section 5. 224.35 (9) of the statutes is created to read:AB1074,3,2013224.35 (9) Office of student loan ombudsman. If the office of student loan 14ombudsman exercises its authority under s. 224.884 (13) to utilize the nationwide 15multistate licensing system and registry, the office has all authority granted to the 16division under this section and may impose any requirement on an applicant or 17licensee under s. 224.884 that could be imposed by the division on an applicant or 18licensee identified in sub. (1r), including requiring submission of materials or other 19information or establishment of a renewal or reinstatement period that differs from 20a period specified in s. 224.884.AB1074,621Section 6. Subchapter V of chapter 224 [precedes 224.881] of the statutes is 22created to read:AB1074,3,2323CHAPTER 224AB1074,4,21SUBCHAPTER V2STUDENT LOANSAB1074,4,33224.881 Definitions. In this subchapter:AB1074,4,44(1) “Board” means the higher educational aids board.AB1074,4,65(2) “Exempt organization” means the board or a state-regulated financial 6service provider.AB1074,4,77(3) “Licensee” means a person holding a license issued under this subchapter.AB1074,4,98(4) “Office” means the office of the student loan ombudsman in the 9department.AB1074,4,1010(5) “Servicing” means doing all of the following:AB1074,4,1211(a) Receiving scheduled periodic payments from a student loan borrower 12pursuant to the terms of a student education loan.AB1074,4,1513(b) Applying the payments of principal and interest and any other payments 14with respect to the amounts received from a student loan borrower as may be 15required pursuant to the terms of a student education loan.AB1074,4,1716(c) Performing other administrative services with respect to a student 17education loan.AB1074,4,1818(6) “State-regulated financial service provider” means any of the following:AB1074,4,1919(a) A bank organized under ch. 221.AB1074,4,2020(b) A savings bank organized under ch. 214.AB1074,4,2121(c) A savings and loan association organized under ch. 215.AB1074,4,2222(d) A credit union organized under ch. 186.AB1074,4,2323(e) A consumer lender licensed under s. 138.09.AB1074,5,31(7) “Student education loan” means a loan that is extended to a student loan 2borrower expressly for postsecondary education expenses or related expenses and 3does not include open-end credit or any loan that is secured by real property. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1074 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1074 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1074 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1074 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1074: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting